Wyoming statutes. Title 36 State Lands
Article 15. Other Designations

Effective dates. —

Laws 2010, ch. 11, § 4, makes the act effective July 1, 2010.

§ 36-8-1501.
State park designation; state historic site designation; state archeological site designation; state recreation area designation.

In addition to state parks designated in other statutes, the following lands are designated as state parks and the department shall by rule specify the legal description of the parks:

The lands in Fremont County managed by the department as of July 1, 2010 as Boysen state park;

The lands in Park County managed by the department as of July 1, 2010 as Buffalo Bill state park;

The lands in Natrona County managed by the department as of July 1, 2010 as Edness Kimball Wilkins state park;

The lands in Platte County managed by the department as of July 1, 2010 as Glendo state park;

The lands in Platte County managed by the department as of July 1, 2010 as Guernsey state park;

The lands in Crook County managed by the department as of July 1, 2010 as Keyhole state park;

The lands in Carbon County managed by the department as of July 1, 2010 as Seminoe state park.

In addition to state historic sites designated in other statutes, the following lands are designated as state historic sites and the department shall by rule specify the legal description of the sites:

The lands in Albany County managed by the department as of July 1, 2010 as Ames Monument state historic site;

The lands in Sheridan County managed by the department as of July 1, 2010 as Conner Battlefield state historic site;

The lands in Sheridan County managed by the department as of July 1, 2010 as Fetterman Battlefield state historic site;

The lands in Sublette County managed by the department as of July 1, 2010 as Fort Bonneville state historic site;

The lands in Uinta County managed by the department as of July 1, 2010 as Fort Bridger state historic site;

The lands in Converse County managed by the department as of July 1, 2010 as Fort Fetterman state historic site;

The lands in Johnson County managed by the department as of July 1, 2010 as Fort Phil Kearny state historic site;

The lands in Johnson County managed by the department as of July 1, 2010 as Fort Reno state historic site;

The lands in Uinta County managed by the department as of July 1, 2010 as Fort Supply state historic site;

The lands in Sweetwater County managed by the department as of July 1, 2010 as Granger Stage Station state historic site;

The lands in Laramie County managed by the department as of July 1, 2010 as the Historic Governors’ Mansion state historic site;

The lands in Natrona County managed by the department as of July 1, 2010 as Independence Rock state historic site;

Repealed by Laws 2018, ch. 30, § 2.

The lands in Lincoln County managed by the department as of July 1, 2010 as Names Hill state historic site;

The lands in Platte County managed by the department as of July 1, 2018 as Oregon Trail state historic site including the Trail Ruts and Register Cliff units;

The lands in Uinta County managed by the department as of July 1, 2010 as Piedmont Kilns state historic site;

The lands in Carbon County managed by the department as of July 1, 2010 as Platte River Stage Crossing state historic site;

The lands in Sweetwater County managed by the department as of July 1, 2010 as Point of Rocks Stage Station state historic site;

The lands in Natrona County managed by the department as of July 1, 2010 as Red Buttes Battle and Cemetery state historic site;

Repealed by Laws 2018, ch. 30, § 2.

The lands in Sheridan County managed by the department as of July 1, 2010 as Trail End state historic site;

The lands in Sheridan County managed by the department as of July 1, 2010 as Wagon Box Fight state historic site;

The lands in Platte County managed by the department as of July 1, 2010 as Wyoming Pioneer Museum state historic site;

The lands in Converse County managed by the department as of July 1, 2018 as Camp Douglas state historic site;

The lands in Campbell County managed by the department as of July 1, 2018 as LX Bar Ranch state historic site;

The lands in Laramie County managed by the department as of the date of any agreement made in accordance with W.S. 36-8-1601(a) as Quebec 1 missile alert facility state historic site.

In addition to state archaeological sites designated in other statutes, the following lands are designated as state archaeological sites and the department shall by rule specify the legal description of the sites:

The lands in Hot Springs County managed by the department as of July 1, 2010 as Legend Rock state archaeological site;

The lands in Big Horn County managed by the department as of July 1, 2018 as Medicine Lodge state archaeological site including upon mutual written agreement with the Wyoming game and fish department the following adjacent state lands to be managed by the department of state parks and cultural resources:

A parcel of land of approximately ten (10) acres in Dry Fork canyon;

A parcel of land of approximately fourteen (14) acres of the pasture parcel in the hay meadow;

A parcel of land of approximately twenty-eight (28) acres west of park headquarters.

The lands in Goshen County managed by the department as of July 1, 2010 as Hawk Springs recreation area are designated as the Hawk Springs state recreation area. The department shall by rule specify the legal description of the recreation area.

History.

Laws 2010, ch. 11, § 1; 2018 ch. 15, § 1, effective July 1, 2018; 2018 ch. 30, §§ 1, 2, effective July 1, 2018.

The 2018 amendments. —

The first 2018 amendment, by ch. 15, § 1, effective July 1, 2018, in (c)(ii), substituted “July 1, 2018 as” for “July 1, 2010 as” and added “including upon mutual written agreement with the Wyoming game and fish department the following adjacent state lands to be managed by the department of state parks and cultural resources”; added (c)(ii)(A) through (C); and made related stylistic changes.

The second 2018 amendment, by ch. 30, § 1, effective July 1, 2018, in (b)(xv), substituted “July 1, 2018 as Oregon Trail state” for “July 1, 2010 as Oregon Trail Ruts state” and added “including the Trail Ruts and Register Cliff units” at the end; and added (b)(xxiv) through (xxvi).

The third 2018 amendment, by ch. 30, § 2, effective July 1, 2018, repealed former (b)(xiii), which read: “The lands in Fremont County managed by the department as of July 1, 2010 as Lander Cemetery state historic site” and former (xx), which read: “The lands in Platte County managed by the department as of July 1, 2010 as Register Cliff state historic site.”

While neither amendment gave effect to the others, all have been given effect in this section as set out above.

Editor’s notes. —

Laws 2018, ch. 15, § 2, provides: “Nothing in this act shall be construed or interpreted to require transfer of ownership of the lands specified in
W.S. 36-8-1501(c)(ii), as amended by this act.”

Laws 2018, ch. 15, § 3, provides: “As required by
W.S. 36-8-1501(c), the department of state parks and cultural resources shall update its rules to include the lands specified in
W.S. 36-8-1501(c)(ii), as amended by this act, in the legal description of the Medicine Lodge state archaeological site upon entering a mutual written agreement with the Wyoming game and fish department to manage the lands.”